en: Baking sheet material: Aluminum; Carbon steel; Silicone; Stainless steel; Teflon; Other
zh-CN: 烤盘材质: 铝; 碳钢; 硅胶; 不锈钢; Teflon; 其他
lt-LT: Kepimo skardos medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglinis plienas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Teflonas; Kita
pt-PT: Material da assadeira: Alumínio; Aço carbono; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Teflon; Outro
nl: Materiaal bakplaat: Aluminium; Koolstofstaal; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Teflon; Andere
sk-SK: Materiál plechu na pečenie: Hliník; Uhlíková oceľ; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Teflón; Iné
da: Bageplademateriale: Aluminum; Kulstofstål; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Teflon; Andet
es: Material de la bandeja para hornear: Aluminio; Acero al carbono; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Teflón; Otros
ru: Материал противня для выпечки: Алюминий; Углеродистая сталь; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Тефлон; Другое
pt-BR: Material da assadeira: Alumínio; Aço carbono; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Teflon; Outro
fi: Leivinpaperin materiaali: Alumiini; Hiiliteräs; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Teflon; Muu
hu: Sütőpapír anyaga: Alumínium; Szénacél; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Teflon; Egyéb
tr: Fırın tepsisi malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon çelik; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Teflon; Diğer
nb: Bakepapirmateriale: Aluminium; Karbonstål; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Teflon; Annet
th: วัสดุสำหรับถาดอบขนม: อะลูมิเนียม; เหล็กคาร์บอน; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เทฟลอน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal lima za pečenje: Aluminij; Ugljični čelik; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Teflon; Ostalo
it: Materiale della teglia: Alluminio; Acciaio al carbonio; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Teflon; Altro
el: Υλικό του ταψιού ψησίματος: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Τεφλόν; Άλλο
de: Backblechmaterial: Aluminium; Kohlenstoffstahl; Silikon; Edelstahl; Teflon; Sonstiges
cs: Materiál plechu na pečení: Hliník; Uhlíková ocel; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Teflon; Jiné
bg-BG: Материал на тавата за печене: Алуминий; Въглеродна стомана; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Тефлон; Други
fr: Matériau de la plaque de cuisson: Aluminum; Woks en acier au carbone; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Téflon; Autre
ja: ベーキングシート材質: アルミニウム; カーボン鋼; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; テフロン; その他
zh-TW: 烤盤材質: 鋁; 碳素鋼; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; Teflon; 其他
pl: Materiał blachy do pieczenia: Aluminium; Stal węglowa; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Teflon; Inne
ko: 베이킹 시트 재료: 알루미늄; 탄소강; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; Teflon; 기타
sl-SI: Material za nizke pekače: Aluminij; Ogljikovo jeklo; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Teflon; Drugo
vi: Vật liệu giấy nướng: Nhôm; Thép carbon; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Chân may Teflon; Khác
ro-RO: Material foaie de copt: Aluminiu; Oțel carbon; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Teflon; Altele
sv: Bakplåt - material: Aluminium; Kolstål; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Teflon; Övrigt